Day 18/arb.withFlagDiacriticsPR.lexc
Multichar_Symbols @P.Definity.Def@  @R.Definity.Def@
                  @P.Definity.Indf@ @R.Definity.Indf@
                  +Def +Indf +Nom +Acc +Gen

LEXICON Root
        Article ;

LEXICON Article
al@P.Definity.Def@      Stems    ;
0                       Stems    ;


LEXICON Stems
kitaab     Case ;   ! book

LEXICON Case
+Def+Nom:u     # ;  !   definite nominative
+Def+Acc:a     # ;  !   definite accusative
+Def+Gen:i     # ;  !   definite genative
 IndefCase ;

LEXICON IndefCase
+Indf+Nom:uN   # ;  ! indefinite nominative
+Indf+Acc:aN   # ;  ! indefinite accusative
+Indf+Gen:iN   # ;  ! indefinite genative
